Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1707.01
Mobile massage therapy establishment, defined.

Mobile massage therapy establishment means a self-contained, self-supporting, enclosed mobile unit licensed under the Massage Therapy Practice Act as a mobile site for the performance of the practices of massage therapy by persons licensed under the act.

Laws 2019, LB244, § 4.